California statutes. Civil Code
-------------------------------------------

1786.24.

(a) If the completeness or accuracy of any item of information contained in his or her file is disputed by a consumer, and the dispute is conveyed directly to the investigative consumer reporting agency by the consumer, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall, without charge, reinvestigate and record the current status of the disputed information or delete the item from the file in accordance with subdivision (c), before the end of the 30-day period beginning on the date on which the agency receives the notice of the dispute
from the consumer.

(b) The agency shall notify any person who provided information in dispute at the address and in the manner specified by that person. The notice shall include all relevant information regarding the dispute that the investigative consumer reporting agency has received from the consumer. The agency shall also promptly provide to the person who provided the information in dispute all relevant information regarding the dispute that is received by the agency from the consumer during the reinvestigation.

(c) In conducting a reinvestigation, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall review and consider all relevant information submitted by the consumer with respect to the disputed item of information.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an investigative consumer reporting agency may terminate a
reinvestigation of information disputed by a consumer if the investigative consumer reporting agency reasonably determines that the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant, including by reason of a failure by a consumer to provide sufficient information to investigate the disputed information. Upon making a determination that a dispute is frivolous or irrelevant, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall notify the consumer, by mail or, if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by any other means available to the agency. In this notification, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall state the specific reasons why it has determined that the consumer’s dispute is frivolous or irrelevant and provide a description of any information required to investigate the disputed information, that may consist of a standardized form describing the general nature of the required information.

(e) If a reinvestigation is made and, after
reinvestigation, the disputed item of information is found to be inaccurate, incomplete, or cannot be verified by the evidence submitted, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall promptly delete that information from the consumer’s file or modify the information, as appropriate, based on the results of the reinvestigation, and shall notify the consumer that the information has been deleted or modified. The consumer reporting agency shall also notify any and all sources from which the disputed information was obtained and inform them in writing of the reasons and results of the reinvestigation, and send a copy of this notification to the consumer. In accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1786.10, the copy of the notification sent to the consumer need not reveal the identity of the source of information, unless otherwise required by law.

(f) No information may be reinserted in the file of a consumer after having been deleted
pursuant to this section, unless the person who furnished the information verifies that the information is complete and accurate. If any information deleted from the file of a consumer is reinserted in the file, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall promptly notify the consumer of the reinsertion in writing or, if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by any other means available to the agency. As part of, or in addition to, this notice, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide to the consumer in writing (1) a statement that the disputed information has been reinserted, (2) the name, address, and telephone number of any furnisher of information contacted or that contacted the investigative consumer reporting agency in connection with the reinsertion, and the telephone number of the furnisher, if reasonably available, and (3) a notice that the consumer has the right to a reinvestigation of the information reinserted by the investigative consumer reporting agency and to add
a statement to his or her file disputing the accuracy or completeness of the information.

(g) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide notice to the consumer of the results of any reinvestigation under this section by mail or, if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by other means available to the agency. The notice shall include (1) a statement that the reinvestigation is completed, (2) an investigative consumer report that is based on the consumer’s file as that file is revised as a result of the reinvestigation, (3) a description or indication of any changes made in the investigative consumer report as a result of those revisions to the consumer’s file, (4) a notice that, if requested by the consumer, a description of the procedure used to determine the accuracy and completeness of the information shall be provided to the consumer by the investigative consumer reporting agency, including the name, business address,
and telephone number of any furnisher of information contacted in connection with that information, (5) a notice that the consumer has the right to add a statement to the consumer’s file disputing the accuracy or completeness of the information, and (6) a notice that the consumer has the right to request that the investigative consumer reporting agency furnish notifications under subdivision (k).

(h) The presence of information in the consumer’s file that contradicts the contention of the consumer shall not, in and of itself, constitute reasonable grounds for believing the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant.

(i) If the investigative consumer reporting agency determines that the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant, or if the reinvestigation does not resolve the dispute, or if the information is reinserted into the file of a consumer pursuant to subdivision (f), the consumer may file
a brief statement setting forth the nature of the dispute. The investigative consumer reporting agency may limit these statements to not more than 500 words if it provides the consumer with assistance in writing a clear summary of the dispute.

(j) If a statement of dispute is filed, the investigative consumer reporting agency shall, in any subsequent investigative consumer report containing the information in question, clearly note that the information is disputed by the consumer and shall include in the report either the statement of the consumer or a clear and accurate summary thereof.

(k) Following the deletion of information from the file of a consumer pursuant to this section, or following the filing of a dispute pursuant to subdivision (i), the investigative consumer reporting agency shall, at the request of the consumer, furnish notification that the item of information has
been deleted or that the item of information is disputed. In the case of disputed information, the notification shall include the statement or summary of the dispute filed pursuant to subdivision (i). This notification shall be furnished to any person who has, within two years prior to the deletion or the filing of the dispute, received an investigative consumer report concerning the consumer for employment purposes, or who has, within one year of the deletion or the filing of the dispute, received an investigative consumer report concerning the consumer for any other purpose, if these investigative consumer reports contained the deleted or disputed information, unless the consumer specifically requests in writing that this notification not be given to all persons or to any specified persons. The investigative consumer reporting agency shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer his or her rights to make a request that this notification not be made.

(l) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall maintain reasonable procedures designed to prevent the reappearance in the file of a consumer and in investigative consumer reports information that has been deleted pursuant to this section and not reinserted pursuant to subdivision (f).

(m) If the dispute of a consumer is resolved by deletion of the disputed information within three business days, beginning with the day the investigative consumer reporting agency receives notice of the dispute in accordance with subdivision (a), the investigative consumer reporting agency is exempt from requirements for further action under subdivisions (g), (i), and (j), if the agency: (1) provides prompt notice of the deletion to the consumer by telephone, (2) provides written confirmation of the deletion and a copy of an investigative consumer report of the consumer that is based on the
file of a consumer after the deletion, and (3) includes, in the telephone notice or in a written notice that accompanies the confirmation and report, a statement of the consumer’s right to request under subdivision (k) that the agency not furnish notifications under that subdivision.

(n) Any investigative consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as defined in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), shall implement an automated system through which furnishers of information to that agency may report the results of a reinvestigation that finds incomplete or inaccurate information in the file of a consumer to other investigative consumer reporting agencies.

(o) All actions to be taken by an investigative consumer reporting agency under this section are governed by the applicable time
periods specified in Section 611 of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681i).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.26.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), an investigative consumer reporting agency may charge a consumer a fee not exceeding eight dollars ($8) for making disclosures to the consumer pursuant to Sections 1786.10, 1786.11, and 1786.22. Any charges shall be indicated to the consumer prior to disclosure.

(b) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall not impose any charge for providing notice to a consumer required under Section 1786.24, furnishing an
investigative consumer report pursuant to Section 1786.24, or notifying a person pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 1786.24 of the deletion of information that is found to be inaccurate or that cannot be verified.

(c) Upon the request of the consumer, an investigative consumer reporting agency shall make all disclosures pursuant to Section 1786.10 and 1786.22 once during any 12-month period without charge to that consumer if the consumer certifies in writing that he or she (1) is unemployed and intends to apply for employment in the 60-day period beginning on the date the certification is made, (2) is a recipient of public welfare assistance, or (3) has reason to believe that the file on the consumer at the investigative consumer reporting agency contains inaccurate information due to fraud.

(d) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall not impose any charge on a
consumer for providing any notification or making any disclosure required by this title, except as authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.28.

(a) Each investigative consumer reporting agency that collects, assembles, evaluates, compiles, reports, transmits, transfers, or communicates items of information concerning consumers which are matters of public record shall specify in any report containing public record information the source from which this information was obtained, including the particular court, if applicable, and the date that this information was initially reported or publicized.

(b) A consumer
reporting agency which furnishes a consumer report for employment purposes and which for that purpose compiles, collects, assembles, evaluates, reports, transmits, transfers, or communicates items of information on consumers which are matters of public record and are likely to have an adverse effect upon a consumer’s ability to obtain employment shall in addition maintain strict procedures designed to insure that whenever public record information which is likely to have an adverse effect on a consumer’s ability to obtain employment is reported it is complete and up to date. For purposes of this paragraph, items of public record relating to arrests, indictments, convictions, suits, tax liens, and outstanding judgments shall be considered up to date if the current public record status of the item at the time of the report is reported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.29.

An investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide the following notices on the first page of an investigative consumer report:

(a) A notice in at least 12-point boldface type setting forth that the report does not guarantee the accuracy or truthfulness of the information as to the subject of the investigation, but only that it is accurately copied from public records, and information generated as a result of identity theft, including evidence of criminal activity, may be inaccurately
associated with the consumer who is the subject of the report.

(b) An investigative consumer reporting agency shall provide a consumer seeking to obtain a copy of a report or making a request to review a file, a written notice in simple, plain English and Spanish setting forth the terms and conditions of his or her right to receive all disclosures, as provided in Section 1786.26.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1030, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.30.

Whenever an investigative consumer reporting agency prepares an investigative consumer report, no adverse information in the report (other than information that is a matter of public record, the status of which has been updated pursuant to Section 1786.28) may be included in a subsequent investigative consumer report unless that adverse information has been verified in the process of making the subsequent investigative consumer report, or the adverse information was received within the three-month period preceding the date the subsequent report is
furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 988, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.40.

(a) Whenever insurance for personal, family, or household purposes, employment, or the hiring of a dwelling unit involving a consumer is denied, or the charge for that insurance or the hiring of a dwelling unit is increased, under circumstances in which a report regarding the consumer was obtained from an investigative consumer reporting agency, the user of the investigative consumer report shall so advise the consumer against whom the adverse action has been taken and supply the name and address of the investigative consumer reporting
agency making the report.

(b) Whenever insurance for personal, family, or household purposes involving a consumer is denied or the charge for that insurance is increased, either wholly or in part because of information bearing upon the consumer’s general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living, that was obtained from a person other than an investigative consumer reporting agency, the consumer, or another person related to the consumer and acting on the consumer’s behalf, the user of the information shall, within a reasonable period of time, and upon the consumer’s written request for the reasons for the adverse action received within 60 days after learning of the adverse action, disclose the nature and substance of the information to the consumer. The user of the information shall clearly and accurately disclose to the consumer his or her right to make this written request at the time the adverse action is communicated to the
consumer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1030, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Remedies [1786.50. - 1786.60.]

1786.50.

(a) An investigative consumer reporting agency or user of information that fails to comply with any requirement under this title with respect to an investigative consumer report is liable to the consumer who is the subject of the report in an amount equal to the sum of all the following:

(1) Any actual damages sustained by the consumer as a result of the failure or, except in the case of class actions, ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever sum is greater.

(2) In the case of any successful action to enforce any liability under this chapter, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(b) If the court determines that the violation was grossly negligent or willful, the court may, in addition, assess, and the consumer may recover, punitive damages.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an investigative consumer reporting agency or user of information that fails to comply with any requirement under this title with respect to an investigative consumer report shall not be liable to a consumer who is the subject of the report where the failure to comply results in a more favorable investigative consumer report than if there had not been a failure to comply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 146, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.52.

Nothing in this chapter shall in any way affect the right of any consumer to maintain an action against an investigative consumer reporting agency, a user of an investigative consumer report, or an informant for invasion of privacy or defamation.

An action to enforce any liability created under this title may be brought in any appropriate court of competent jurisdiction within two years from the date of discovery.

(a) Any investigative consumer
reporting agency or user of information against whom an action brought pursuant to Section 1681n or 1681o of Title 15 of the United States Code is pending shall not be subject to suit for the same act or omission under Section 1786.50.

(b) The entry of a final judgment against the investigative consumer reporting agency or user of information in an action brought pursuant to the provisions of Section 1681n or 1681o of Title 15 of the United States Code shall be a bar to the maintenance of any action based on the same act or omission which might be brought under this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 354, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.53.

(a) Any person who collects, assembles, evaluates, compiles, reports, transmits, transfers, or communicates information on a consumer’s character, general reputation, personnel characteristics, or mode of living, for employment purposes, which are matters of public record, and does not use the services of an investigative consumer reporting agency, shall provide that information to the consumer pursuant to subdivision (b). For purposes of this section:

(1) “Adverse
action,” as relating to employment, means a denial of employment or any decision made for an employment purpose that adversely affects any current or prospective employee.

(2) The term “person” does not include an agency subject to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8).

(3) “Public records” means records documenting an arrest, indictment, conviction, civil judicial action, tax lien, or outstanding judgment.

(b) (1) Any person described in subdivision (a), or any person who receives information pursuant to subdivision (a), shall provide a copy of the related public record to the consumer within seven days after receipt of the information, regardless of whether the information is received in a written or oral form.

(2) Any person shall provide on any job application form, or any other written form, a box that, if checked by the consumer, permits the consumer to waive his or her right to receive a copy of any public record obtained pursuant to this section.

(3) If any person obtains a public record pursuant to this section for the purpose of conducting an investigation for suspicion of wrongdoing or misconduct by the subject of the investigation, the person may withhold the information until the completion of the investigation. Upon completion, the person shall provide a copy of the public record pursuant to paragraph (1), unless the consumer waived his or her rights pursuant to paragraph (2).

(4) If any person takes any adverse action as a result of receiving information pursuant to subdivision (a), the person shall provide to the
consumer a copy of the public record, regardless of whether the consumer waived his or her rights pursuant to paragraph (2).

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) or (b) requires any person to provide the same information to any consumer on more than one occasion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1030, Sec. 7.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.54.

This title does not apply to any investigative consumer report which by its terms is limited to disclosures from public records relating to land and land titles or which is a report issued preliminary to the issuance of a policy of title insurance, and it does not apply to any person whose records are maintained for the primary purpose of reporting those portions of public records which impart constructive notice under the law of matters relating to land and land titles and which may be issued as the basis for the issuance of a policy of title insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.55.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to modify Section 1198.5 of the Labor Code or existing law concerning information obtained by an employer or employment agency without the use of the services of an investigative consumer reporting agency for employment reference checks, background investigations, credential verifications, or employee investigations, except as provided in Section 1786.53. Nothing in this chapter is intended to change or supersede existing law related to privileged attorney-client communications or attorney work product, or require the
production or disclosure of that information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1030, Sec. 8.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.56.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.57.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.60.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 1798.85, prior to July 1, 2004, any financial institution may print the social security number of an individual on any account statement or similar document mailed to that individual, if the social security number is provided in connection with a transaction governed by the rules of the National Automated Clearing House Association, or a transaction initiated by a federal governmental entity through an automated clearing house network.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 907, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6B. CONSUMER CREDIT DENIAL [1787.1. - 1787.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1787.1. - 1787.2.]

1787.1.

This title may be cited as “The Holden Credit Denial Disclosure Act of 1976.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

1787.2.

(a) Within 30 days, or at a later reasonable time as specified in federal law or regulations, after receipt of a completed written application for credit, a creditor shall notify the applicant of its action on the application.

(b) Each applicant denied credit shall be entitled to a statement of reasons for such action from the creditor. A creditor satisfies this obligation by:

(1) Providing statements of reasons in writing as a matter of course to applicants denied credit; or

(2) Giving written notification of credit denial which discloses:

(i) The applicant’s right to a statement of reasons within 30 days after receipt by the creditor of a request made within 60 days after such notification; and 

(ii) The identity and address of the person or office from which the statement of reasons may be obtained.

(3) The statement of reasons may be given orally if the written notification advises the applicant of the right to have the statement of reasons confirmed in writing on written request.

(c) A statement of reasons meets the requirements of this section only if it contains the specific reasons for the credit denial.

(d) Where a creditor has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to an applicant, the notification and statement of reasons required by this section may be made directly by such creditor, or indirectly through the third party, provided in either case that the identity of the creditor is disclosed.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “applicant” means a natural person who applies for credit primarily for personal, family or household purposes.

(2) The term “credit denial” means a denial or revocation of credit, a change in the terms of an existing credit arrangement, or a refusal to grant credit in substantially the amount or on substantially the terms requested. Such term does not include a refusal to extend additional credit under an
existing credit arrangement where the applicant is delinquent or otherwise in default, or where such additional credit would exceed a previously established credit limit without a specific written application or written request for an increase in the credit limit.

(3) The term “creditor” refers only to creditors who regularly extend, or arrange for the extension of, credit whether in connection with loans, sales of property or services, or otherwise.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any authority, derived from other provisions of law, of any state department or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Remedies [1787.3. - 1787.4.]

1787.3.

(a) Any creditor who fails to comply with any requirement of Section 1787.2 shall be liable for any actual damages sustained by an applicant as a result of such failure.

(b) Any creditor, other than a government or governmental subdivision or agency, who fails to comply with any requirement imposed under this title shall be liable to the aggrieved applicant for punitive damages in an amount not greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in addition to any actual damages provided in subdivision (a), except that in the case of a class action the total recovery under this subdivision
shall not exceed the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 1 percent of the net worth of the creditor. In determining the amount of such damages in any action, the court shall consider, among other relevant factors, the amount of any actual damages awarded, the frequency and persistence of failures of compliance by the creditor, the resources of the creditor, the number of persons adversely affected, and the extent to which the creditor’s failure of compliance was intentional.

(c) In the case of any action brought by an aggrieved applicant under subdivision (a) or (b), the costs of the action, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee as determined by the court, shall be added to any damages awarded by the court.

(d) No provision of this title imposing liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any official rule, regulation,
or interpretation thereby by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or in conformity with any interpretation or approval by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the board to issue such interpretations or approvals under such procedures as the board may prescribe therefor, notwithstanding that after such act or omission has occurred, such rule, regulation, interpretation, or approval is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(e) Actions alleging a failure to comply with any requirement of Section 1787.2 shall be brought within two years from the date of the occurrence of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

1787.4.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6C. FAIR DEBT COLLECTION PRACTICES [1788. - 1788.33.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1788. - 1788.3.]

1788.

This title may be cited as the Rosenthal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 375, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.1.

(a) The Legislature makes the following findings:

(1) The banking and credit system and grantors of credit to consumers are dependent upon the collection of just and owing debts. Unfair or deceptive collection practices undermine the public confidence, which is essential to the continued functioning of the banking and credit system and sound extensions of credit to consumers and small businesses.

(2) There is need to ensure that debt collectors and debtors exercise their responsibilities to one another with fairness, honesty and due regard for the rights of the other.

(b) It is the purpose of this title to prohibit debt collectors from engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the collection of consumer debts and small business debts and to require debtors to act fairly in entering into and honoring those debts, as specified in this title.

(c) Nothing in this title is intended to create or impose an additional licensing requirement under Division 25 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Financial Code on a debt collector with respect to the collection of covered commercial debt or covered commercial credit.

(d) The provisions of this title related to covered commercial credit or covered commercial debt
 apply to covered commercial credit or covered commercial debt entered into, renewed, sold, or assigned on or after July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 1.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.2.

(a) Definitions and rules of construction set forth in this section are applicable for the purpose of this title.

(b) The term “debt collection” means any act or practice in connection with the collection of covered debts.

(c) The term “debt collector” means any person who, in the ordinary course of business, regularly, on behalf of that person or others, engages in debt collection. The term includes any person who composes and sells, or offers to compose and sell, forms, letters, and other collection media used or intended to be used for debt collection.

(d) The term “debt” means money, property, or their equivalent that is due or owing
 or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person to another person.

(e) The term “consumer credit transaction” means a transaction between a natural person and another person in which property, services, or money is acquired on credit by that natural person from the other person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(f) The terms “consumer debt” and “consumer credit” mean money, property, or their equivalent, due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person by reason of a consumer credit transaction. The term “consumer debt” includes a mortgage debt.

(g) The term “person” means a natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other similar entity.

(h) (1) Except as provided in Section 1788.18, the term “debtor” means a natural person from whom a debt collector seeks to collect a covered debt that is due and owing or alleged to be due and owing from that person.

(2) In relation to a covered commercial debt or covered commercial credit, a “debtor” shall mean a natural person who guarantees an obligation related to a covered commercial credit transaction.

(i) The term “creditor” means a person who extends covered credit to a debtor.

(j) The term “consumer credit report” means any written, oral, or other communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living that is used
 or expected to be used or collected in whole or in part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing the consumer’s eligibility for (1) credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or (2) employment purposes, or (3) other purposes authorized under any applicable federal or state law or regulation. The term does not include (a) any report containing information solely as to transactions or experiences between the consumer and the person making the report; (b) any authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device; or (c) any report in which a person who has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to a consumer conveys that person’s decision with respect to that request, if the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the person to whom the request was made, and the person makes the disclosures to the
 consumer required under any applicable federal or state law or regulation.

(k) The term “consumer reporting agency” means any person that, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages, in whole or in part, in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer credit reports to third parties and uses any means or facility for the purpose of preparing or furnishing consumer credit reports.

(l) The term “covered debt” means a consumer debt or a covered commercial debt.

(m) The term “covered credit” means consumer credit or covered commercial credit.

(n) (1) The terms “covered commercial debt” and “covered
 commercial credit” mean money due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person to a lender, a commercial financing provider, as defined in Section 22800 of the Financial Code, or a debt buyer, as defined in Section 1788.50, by reason of one or more covered commercial credit transactions, provided the total amount of all covered commercial credit transactions and all other noncovered commercial credit transactions due and owing by the debtor or other person obligated under the transactions to the same lender, commercial financing provider, or debt buyer is no more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(A) For credit owed to a lender or commercial financing provider, the total value of credit per transaction is determined as of when the transaction is first entered into and is the maximum amount that the creditor is contractually required to provide or make available to the debtor over the life of the transaction or is
 the maximum amount that is enumerated in an open-end credit agreement.

(B) The value of credit for each transaction for a debt buyer is the amount owing or alleged to be owing to the debt buyer when the debt buyer acquires the rights of the lender or commercial financing provider in the commercial credit.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, covered commercial debt does not include either of the following:

(A) Trade credit.

(B) A commercial financing transaction in which the recipient is a dealer as defined by Section 285 of the Vehicle Code, or an affiliate of the dealer, pursuant to a specific commercial financing offer or commercial open-end credit plan of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), including, but not limited to, a
 commercial loan made pursuant to that commercial financing transaction.

(o) The term “covered commercial credit transaction” means a transaction between a person and another person in which a total value of no more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), is acquired on credit by that person from the other person for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(p) The term “trade credit” means an extension of credit that meets both of the following conditions:

(1) The credit is extended by a person whose primary business is the furnishing or provision of goods, materials, equipment, or services.

(2) The credit is extended in connection with the furnishing or provision of goods, materials, equipment, or services, unless
 the transaction is structured as “lease financing” as defined in Section 22800 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 3.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1788.3.

Nothing contained in this title shall be construed to prohibit a credit union chartered under Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of the Financial Code or under the Federal Credit Union Act (Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1751) of Title 12 of the United States Code) from providing information to an employer when the employer is ordinarily and necessarily entitled to receive such information because he is an employee, officer, committee member, or agent of such credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Debt Collector Responsibilities [1788.10. - 1788.185.]

1788.10.

No debt collector shall collect or attempt to collect a covered debt by means of the following conduct:

(a) The use, or threat of use, of physical force or violence or any criminal means to cause harm to the person, or the reputation, or the property of any person.

(b) The threat that the failure to pay a covered debt will result in an accusation that the debtor has committed a crime where the accusation, if made, would be false.

(c) The communication of, or threat to communicate to any person the fact that a debtor has engaged in conduct, other
 than the failure to pay a covered debt, which the debt collector knows or has reason to believe will defame the debtor.

(d) The threat to the debtor to sell or assign to another person the obligation of the debtor to pay a covered debt, with an accompanying false representation that the result of the sale or assignment would be that the debtor would lose any defense to the covered debt.
